Washington statutes.
RCW 15.89.120

Deposit of money.

The commission shall deposit money collected under RCW 15.89.110 in a separate account in the name of the commission in any bank that is a state depositary. All expenditures and disbursements made from this account under this chapter may be made without the necessity of a specific legislative appropriation. RCW 43.01.050 does not apply to this account or to the money received, collected, or expended as provided in this chapter.

[ 2006 c 330 s 15.]